Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Chapter 13

Offices of Legislative Administration

3-13-101. Creation — Duties.

There is created the office of legislative administration, which has the duty to:

Assist the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and the heads of any legislative committees or offices with the preparation of budgets;

Provide for processing of all forms and records on members and employees of the general assembly;

Perform any recruitment or training requested by, or with the approval of, the speakers;

Maintain such personnel records as may be necessary or advisable in accordance with accepted personnel practices;

Prepare the payroll for all members and employees of the general assembly, its offices and committees and provide for the disbursement of payroll checks;

Provide for the payment of compensation and of expense and mileage allowances to members, the payment of travel expenses of all employees, and the payment of any committee expenses authorized by the speaker of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives;

Promulgate for legislative employees on official business travel regulations established by the committee and approved by the speakers;

Purchase and distribute supplies and equipment required for the operation of the general assembly;

Provide for maintenance services for all legislative facilities;

Make disbursements of funds for all other lawful expenses of the general assembly;

Assume any other duties or responsibilities or to take any action in budgeting or administration as directed by the committee or either speaker; and

Establish and implement a policy in conjunction with the two (2) speakers for the prevention of sexual harassment; this policy shall include training workshops and the establishment of a hearing procedure.

This office shall succeed to all functions of legislative administration or budgeting heretofore performed by the office of the comptroller of the treasury, and all office furnishings and supplies in use by the office of legislative administration shall be retained by that office.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 14; T.C.A., § 3-1301; Acts 1993, ch. 307, § 2.

Cross-References. Department of personnel, sexual harassment workshops, §4-3-1703.

Legal and administrative assistance from other state officers, departments, institutions and agencies, §3-10-105.

Posting of sexual harassment policy by state entities, §4-3-124.

Law Reviews.

What Part of “No” Don't You Understand?: Recent Developments in Workplace Sexual Harassment Law (William D. Evans Jr.), 36 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 14 (2000).

3-13-102. Director — Staff.

The joint legislative services committee shall appoint, subject to the approval of the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, a director of legislative administration. The director shall be a graduate of an accredited college or university or shall have such training or practical experience in finance, public administration, or accounting as may be deemed necessary to perform the duties of the office. The director and other personnel shall be chosen without reference to party affiliation but solely on the basis of fitness to perform the duties of the office. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the committee. The committee shall determine the compensation of the director, while the compensation of other personnel shall be determined by the committee upon recommendation of the director. Personnel shall be employed on recommendation of the director with the approval of the speakers.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 15; T.C.A., § 3-1302.

Cross-References. Advisory group for sick leave bank for state legislative employees, §8-50-945.

Legal and administrative assistance from other state officers, departments, institutions and agencies, §3-10-105.

3-13-103. Office space — Facilities.

Suitable office space and facilities shall be provided in Nashville convenient to the general assembly.

Acts 1977, ch. 89, § 15; T.C.A., § 3-1303.

3-13-104. Posting of report of per diem payments and reimbursed expenses on general assembly web site.

The director of legislative administration shall cause to be posted on the official general assembly web site a report, by member, that contains the per diem payments made to members of the general assembly and all other expenses, including out-of-state travel, reimbursed in accordance with the provisions of §3-1-106. The report shall include the purpose of the reimbursement made. The initial report shall be filed no later than fifteen (15) days following the last day of April 2006, and shall include all payments made from the first day of January 2006, until the last day of March 2006. Thereafter, the report shall be updated quarterly, no later than fifteen (15) days following the end of the quarter. The reports shall remain on the web site until one month following the end of each general assembly. The last quarter reported in each general assembly shall include the period of time from the last quarter reported until the regular November election and the first report in each general assembly shall include the period of time from the regular November election until the end of the first quarter.

Acts 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 45.

Cross-References. Posting of report of travel and expense reimbursements on state web site, §4-3-1010.